Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 5. Sheriffs

§ 290.
County sheriff’s department.

A sheriff’s department is established in each county. It shall consist of the elected sheriff in each county, and such deputy sheriffs and supporting staff as may be appointed by the sheriff. Full-time employees of the sheriff’s department, paid by the county, shall be county employees for all purposes but shall be eligible to join the State Employees Retirement System, provided the county shall pay the employer’s share. The sheriff’s department shall be entitled to utilize all State services available to a town within the county.

Full-time deputy sheriffs whose primary responsibility is transportation of prisoners and persons with a mental condition or psychiatric disability shall be paid by the State of Vermont. The appointment of such deputies and their salary shall be approved by the Governor or his or her designee. The Executive Committee of the Vermont Sheriffs Association and the Executive Director of the Department of State’s Attorneys and Sheriffs shall jointly have authority for the assignment of position locations in the counties of State-paid deputy sheriffs and shall review the county location assignments periodically for efficient use of resources.

Equity, indebtedness, ownership of equipment, and title to motor vehicles associated with the operation of each sheriff’s department and purchased with department funds shall be held in the name of the department, not in the name of the sheriff. The department is constituted as a legal entity with the power to contract and incur liabilities.

Upon the election of a sheriff-elect who is not the incumbent sheriff, or upon notice of the resignation of the sheriff, all financial disbursements from the accounts of the department, including the transfer of real or personal property, or other assets, of the department shall be co-signed by the sheriff and the assistant judges. A report of all financial disbursements or transfers made pursuant to this subsection shall be forwarded by the assistant judges to the Auditor of Accounts within 15 days of completion of the out-going sheriff’s duties.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 218

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1987, No. 262

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1991, No. 257

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2009, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 149.

§ 290b.
Audits.

[Repealed.]

The Auditor of Accounts shall adopt and sheriffs shall comply with a uniform system of accounts, controls, and procedures for the sheriff’s department, which accurately reflects the receipt and disbursement of all funds by the department, the sheriff, and all employees of the department. The uniform system shall include:

requirements for written financial records and books;

procedures for the recording of all financial transactions and the maintenance of such records;

procedures to ensure proper documentation to ensure that all disbursement transactions are properly supported, approved, and recorded;

procedures to ensure that all receipts are properly supported and recorded;

procedures to ensure that bank receipt and disbursement accounts are reconciled on a timely basis;

procedures for the preparation of an annual set of financial reports which accurately reflects the financial transactions and condition of the department;

procedures to ensure that all payments for services performed by the sheriff, deputy sheriffs, or other employees of the department rendered by virtue of their office are made to the sheriff’s department;

procedures and controls which identify revenues received from public entities through appropriations or grants from the federal, State, or local governments from revenues received through contracts with private entities; and

other procedures and requirements as the Auditor of Accounts deems necessary.

The Auditor of Accounts and his or her designee may at any time examine the records, accounts, books, papers, contracts, reports, and other materials of the county sheriff departments as they pertain to the financial transactions, obligations, assets, and receipts of that department. The Auditor or his or her designee shall conduct an audit of the accounts for a sheriff’s department whenever the incumbent sheriff leaves office, and the auditor shall charge for the costs of the report pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 168(b)

.

Annually, each sheriff shall furnish the Auditor of Accounts on forms provided by the Auditor a financial report reflecting the financial transactions and condition of the sheriff’s department. The sheriff shall submit a copy of this report to the assistant judges of the county. The assistant judges shall prepare a report reflecting funds disbursed by the county in support of the sheriff’s department and forward a copy of their report to the Auditor of Accounts. The Auditor of Accounts shall compile the reports and submit one report to the House and Senate Committees on Judiciary. The provisions of

2 V.S.A. § 20(d)

(expiration of required reports) shall not apply to the required report to be made under this subsection.

Biennially, according to a schedule established by the Auditor of Accounts, the Auditor shall retain a public accountant to conduct an audit of the financial systems, controls, and procedures within each department. The public accountant shall prepare a written report detailing the review of the department. A copy of this report shall be forwarded to the sheriff, assistant judges, and the Auditor of Accounts. The Auditor shall charge for the costs of the report pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 168(b)

.

HISTORY:

Amended

1991, No. 257

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. July 1, 1993;

1993, No. 60

, § 55a;

2011, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 18, eff. May 14, 2012;

2015, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2019, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § E.130.1, eff. Oct. 2, 2020.

§ 291.
Bond; oath.

Before entering upon the duties of his or her office, a sheriff shall become bound to the treasurer of the county in the sum of $100,000.00, with two or more sufficient sureties by way of recognizance, before the two assistant judges in such county, or give a bond to the treasurer executed by such sheriff with sufficient sureties in like sum to be approved by the two assistant judges, conditioned for the faithful performance of his or her duties and shall take the oath of office before one of the judges, who shall certify the same on the sheriff’s commission. Such recognizance or bond and the commission shall be forthwith recorded in the office of the county clerk.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

1991, No. 257

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 176.

§ 291a.
Contracts.

In the name of the sheriff’s department, the sheriff may enter into written contracts with the State of Vermont, an agency of the United States, one or more towns within or without the county, or any nongovernmental entity, to provide law enforcement or other related services including security services, central dispatching for police, fire, or ambulance services, and centralized support services. Contracts between the sheriff’s department and a town shall be valid if approved by the sheriff and by a majority of the selectboard of the town provided that funding has been approved by a duly warned annual or special town meeting. Deputy sheriffs engaged in the performance of a contract shall be considered employees of the sheriff’s department for all purposes, except that for purposes of determining eligibility for Social Security, employees under this section shall be considered county employees, provided however that the sheriffs’ departments shall be responsible for employers’ contributions.

A contract made with a town to provide law enforcement or related services shall contain provisions governing the following subjects as best suit the needs of the parties:

the services to be provided, including State statutes or town ordinances, or both, which are to be enforced;

rates of compensation, allocation of expenses, total cost of contract, and methods of payment therefor;

ownership of any property acquired under the contract in event of termination of the contract;

the type, frequency, and information to be contained in reports submitted by the sheriff’s department to the town;

methods adopted to resolve disputes;

the term of the contract shall specify the commencement and termination date of the services to be provided and provisions for renewal thereof; and

such other items, not inconsistent with law, as may be agreed upon.

A contract under this section may contain provisions for compensation to the sheriff for administration of the contract and related services. No compensation may be paid to a sheriff for administration of the contract or related services unless the contract sets forth in writing the rate or method of calculation for the compensation and a schedule of payment; provided that a sheriff’s compensation for administration shall not exceed five percent of the contract. A sheriff’s rate of compensation shall be at a rate equivalent to other employees of the department who provide similar services under the contract. Compensation to the sheriff shall be made in accordance with the schedule set forth in the contract but in no event may a sheriff be compensated for administration of the contract and related services unless the compensation is made in the same calendar year in which the revenue was received by the department under the contract.

An agreement or contract for services between a sheriff’s department and governmental or nongovernmental entity shall be in writing if the total cost of the contract or agreement exceeds $2,000.00 or the duration of the services provided exceeds ten working days or if the cumulative total of the contracts or agreements entered into by the sheriff’s department and the same governmental or nongovernmental entity exceeds $2,000.00 or ten working days within a calendar year. Annually, the sheriff shall submit to the assistant judges for filing with the county clerk a report of all written contracts, categorized by the contracting party, services rendered, date of contract, and amount received.

Each sheriff’s department shall establish a procedure for all purchase contracts entered into by the department. The procedure shall be established in writing, filed with the assistant judges, and made available for public review. The written procedure shall also be forwarded to the Auditor of Accounts for use in the conduct of audits required under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 218

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1987, No. 121

, § 10;

1991, No. 257

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 292.
Office vacant.

When such sheriff neglects to become so bound within 15 days from the beginning of his or her term of office, the office of sheriff shall be vacant.

§ 293.
Duties.

A sheriff so commissioned and sworn shall serve and execute lawful writs, warrants, and processes directed to him or her, according to the precept thereof, and do all other things pertaining to the office of sheriff.

§ 294.
Sheriff imprisoned.

If a sheriff is confined in prison by legal process, his or her functions as sheriff shall be suspended. When the sheriff is released from imprisonment during his or her term of office, he or she shall file a certificate of his or her discharge signed by one of the judges of the Superior Court, in the office of the county clerk, and deliver a like certificate to the high bailiff. Thereupon he or she shall resume the powers and execute the duties of sheriff.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 177.

§ 295.
Repealed.
1971, No. 258 (Adj. Sess.), § 19.

§ 296.
Transportation of prisoners.

All commitments to a State correctional facility or to any other place named by the Commissioner of Corrections or committing court shall be made by any sheriff, deputy sheriff, State Police officer, police officer, or constable in the State, or the Commissioner of Corrections or his or her authorized agent.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 345

(Adj. Sess.), § 18, eff. April 1, 1969;

1969, No. 33

, § 3, eff. April 1, 1969;

1989, No. 187

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1995, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2007, No. 15

, § 19;

2011, No. 79

(Adj. Sess.), § 29a, eff. April 4, 2012.

§ 296a.
Civil liability resulting from escaped prisoner.

A jailer or other officer who, through negligence, suffers a prisoner in his or her custody, convicted of or charged with a crime, to escape, shall be civilly liable to any person proximately damaged as a result thereof to the maximum amount of $500.00. A person so damaged may maintain a civil action therefor.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 233

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. April 17, 1978.

§§ 297,
298.
Repealed.
1967, No. 345 (Adj. Sess.), § 32, eff. April 1, 1969.

§ 299.
Duties as peace officer.

A sheriff shall preserve the peace, and suppress, with force and strong hand, if necessary, unlawful disorder.
He or she may apprehend, without warrant, persons assembled in disturbance of the peace, and bring them before a Criminal Division of the Superior Court, which shall proceed with such person as with persons brought before it by process issued by such court.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 194

, § 10, eff. July 1, 1965, operative Feb. 1, 1967;

1973, No. 249

(Adj. Sess.), § 78, eff. April 9, 1974;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238.

§ 300.
May require assistance.

A sheriff or other officer in the discharge of the duties of his or her office, for the preservation of the peace, or the suppression or prevention of any criminal matter or cause, may require suitable assistance.

§ 301.
Penalty for refusal to assist.

A person being required in the name of the State by a sheriff, deputy sheriff, high bailiff, deputy bailiff, or constable, who neglects or refuses to assist the officer in the execution of his or her office, in a criminal cause, in the preservation of the peace, in the apprehension and securing of a person for a breach of the peace, in a search and seizure of alcohol as defined in

7 V.S.A. § 2

or in transporting the alcohol when seized, or in a case of escape or rescue of persons arrested on civil process, shall be fined not more than $500.00, unless the circumstances under which his or her assistance is called for amount to a riot, in which case he or she shall be imprisoned not more than six months or fined not more than $100.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended

2017, No. 83

, § 157.

§ 302.
Power to search; return.

In the daytime, a sheriff may enter and search houses, buildings, or other places for a person for whose apprehension he or she has a warrant, issued in a criminal prosecution, a prosecution for bastardy, or on a bailpiece.
He or she may so enter with a warrant or extent for the collection of taxes, or the collection of a fine, or with a warrant to search for goods or chattels stolen or purloined, when such property is supposed to be secreted therein.
He or she shall not make return in any case that he or she cannot execute any such precept.

§ 303.
Obstructing sheriff; penalty.

A person who refuses a sheriff entrance to his or her house or other buildings as provided in section 302 of this title, or threatens him or her or abuses him or her or his or her assistants before or after he or she has entered such buildings, or hinders him or her in any way in the execution of the warrants provided for in section 302, shall be fined not more than $200.00.

§ 304.
Liability for misfeasance of deputy.

Actions for official misfeasance or neglect of a deputy sheriff, or for cause affecting his or her administration of the office, shall be sustained only against the sheriff; but the sheriff shall not be amenable criminally for the conduct of his or her deputy, other than for fines for neglect of duty.

§ 305.
Not to appear as counsel, or make writ.

A sheriff or deputy sheriff shall not appear in any court as counsel, nor make a writ, complaint, answer, or other precept or process, except in his or her own cause.
A writ, complaint, or other process herein prohibited made by him or her shall be dismissed and the defendant recover his or her costs.

§ 306.
Term of office.

A sheriff shall execute his or her official duties until his or her successor is qualified to act.

§ 307.
Deputy sheriffs; appointments and revocation.

A sheriff may appoint deputies who need not be legal residents of the State, one or more of whom shall be a woman. The duties of deputy sheriffs shall be the same as those imposed by law on sheriffs and other peace officers in the enforcement of the criminal law. A deputy shall not perform an official act until his or her deputation and oath are filed for record in the office of the county clerk. A sheriff may dismiss a deputy and revoke his or her deputation. Such revocation shall be recorded in the office of the county clerk and shall take effect from the day of such record.

A sheriff may appoint persons as deputy sheriffs to serve civil process, including child support enforcement as provided in

15 V.S.A. § 800

, whom the sheriff shall train and supervise. Such deputies need not be qualified law enforcement officers, but if not so qualified shall not have arrest powers, and shall not carry firearms in performance of their duties in serving civil process.

The powers of deputy sheriffs with respect to criminal matters and the enforcement of the law may be exercised statewide.

HISTORY:

Amended

1977, No. 218

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1987, No. 122

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 26, 1988;

2009, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § C20;

2013, No. 49

, § 4.

§ 308.
Deputy sheriffs; no compensation for appointment; penalty.

A sheriff shall not ask of or receive from his or her deputies any pay, compensation or reward by way of deputation fee, or otherwise, for such appointments.

A sheriff who violates a provision of this section shall be fined not more than $200.00 nor less than $50.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

2017, No. 74

, § 69.

§ 309.
Bonds of deputies; liability of sheriff; deputy’s powers and duties.

A sheriff shall be liable for the official acts and neglects of his or her deputies, and may take bonds of indemnity from them. Such deputies may, and when required, shall perform any official duty which may be required of the sheriff. Returns of their acts and doings shall be signed by them as deputy sheriffs, and their official acts shall be deemed to be the acts of the sheriff.

§ 310.
Repealed. 2013, No. 49, § 5.

§ 311.
Training requirements.

No person may receive an appointment as a deputy sheriff unless he or she has been awarded a certificate by the Executive Director of the Criminal Justice Training Council attesting to his or her satisfactory completion of an approved basic training program, except as provided in section 307(b) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 7

, § 2, eff. July 1, 1971; amended

1977, No. 218

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.

§ 312.
Jurisdiction of sheriffs.

The powers of sheriffs with respect to criminal matters and the enforcement of the law may be exercised statewide.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 122

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Jan. 26, 1988; amended

1991, No. 257

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2015, No. 2

, § 3, eff. March 12, 2015.